Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.075

Marital status—Payment for or on account of children.

Under this chapter, the marital status of all victims shall be deemed to be fixed as of the date of the criminal act. All references to the child or children living or conceived of the victim in this chapter shall be deemed to refer to such child or children as of the date of the criminal act unless the context clearly indicates the contrary.

Payments for or on account of any such child or children shall cease when such child is no longer a "child" or on the death of any such child whichever occurs first.

Payments to the victim or surviving spouse for or on account of any such child or children shall be made only when the victim or surviving spouse has legal custody of any such child or children. Where the victim or surviving spouse does not have such legal custody any payments for or on account of any such child or children shall be made to the person having legal custody of such child or children and the amount of payments shall be subtracted from the payments which would have been due the victim or surviving spouse had legal custody not been transferred to another person. It shall be the duty of any person or persons receiving payments because of legal custody of any child to immediately notify the department of any change in such legal custody.

[ 2011 c 346 s 207; 1977 ex.s. c 302 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 176 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.